North Dakota, session 69, SB2105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Student surveys - Requirements.
1. As used in this section, "survey" means a screening tool, questionnaire, poll, or other
written document used to obtain information about a student from the student,
including surveys related to behavioral health. The term does not include a survey
administered or approved by a licensed teacher or administrator of a school, including
a center for career and technical education, for educational or extracurricular
purposes.
2. A school may not administer a survey to a student on behalf of a third party other than
the department of public instruction.
3. If a student's parent or legal guardian has reviewed a copy of a survey and authorized
in writing that the student may participate in the survey, a school may administer the
survey to that student.
Page No. 1 25.0489.03000